Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-904
License required; void transaction; effect.

No person shall operate a delayed deposit services business or make or offer a delayed deposit transaction in this state unless the person is licensed by the director as provided in the Delayed Deposit Services Licensing Act. Any delayed deposit transaction that is made by a person who is required to be licensed pursuant to the act but who is not licensed is void, and the person making such delayed deposit transaction has no right to collect, receive, or retain any principal, interest, fees, or any other charges in connection with such delayed deposit transaction.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB194, § 4.